North Carolina statutes. Chapter 140. State Art Museum; Symphony and Art Societies.
Article 3. North Carolina State Art Society. [Repealed]

§ 140-11.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 476, s. 81.

§§ 140-12 through 140-14.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-120, s. 1(c), effective October 1, 2012.

History.

S. 140-12; 1961, c. 1152; 1983, c. 717, ss. 52, 53; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 955, ss. 54, 55; 2006-66, s. 22.22(c); 2006-203, s. 81; 2006-221, s. 23; repealed by 2012-120, s. 1(c), effective October 1, 2012. s. 140-13; 1961, c. 1152; 1977, c. 702, s. 1; 1983, c. 913, s. 29; 2006-66, s. 22.22(d); 2006-221, s. 23; repealed by 2012-120, s. 1(c), effective October 1, 2012. s. 140-14; 1961, c. 1152; 1977, c. 702, s. 2; 2006-66, s. 22.22(a); 2006-221, s. 23; repealed by 2012-120, s. 1(c), effective October 1, 2012.

§ 140-15.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1999-337, s. 35(b).